Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5888.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-29-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-29 entitled "Domestic
Violence Prevention Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-29-5. Disposition of domestic violence cases.
(a) Every person convicted of, or placed on probation for, a crime involving domestic
violence or whose case is filed pursuant to § 12-10-12 where the defendant pleads nolo contendere,
in addition to any other sentence imposed or counseling ordered, shall be ordered by the judge to
attend, at his or her own expense, a batterer’s intervention program appropriate to address his or
her violent behavior; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to
complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’
Administration. This order shall be included in the conditions of probation. Failure of the defendant
to comply with the order shall be a basis for violating probation and/or the provisions of § 12-10-
12. This provision shall not be suspended or waived by the court.
(b) Every person convicted of, or placed on probation for, a crime involving domestic
violence as enumerated in § 12-29-2, or whose case is filed pursuant to § 12-10-12 where the
defendant pleads guilty or nolo contendere, in addition to other court costs or assessments imposed,
shall be ordered to pay a one hundred twenty-five dollar ($125) assessment. Eighty percent (80%)
of the assessment collected pursuant to this section shall be provided to the Rhode Island Coalition
Against Domestic Violence for programs to assist victims of domestic violence and twenty percent
(20%) of the assessment shall be deposited as general revenue.

(c)(1) Every person convicted of an offense punishable as a misdemeanor involving
domestic violence as defined in § 12-29-2 shall:
(i) For a second violation, including both prior felony and misdemeanor convictions, be
imprisoned for a term of not less than ten (10) days and not more than one year.
(ii) For a third and subsequent violation, including both prior felony and misdemeanor
convictions, be deemed guilty of a felony and be imprisoned for a term of not less than one year
and not more than ten (10) years.
(2) No jail sentence provided for under this section can be suspended.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as limiting the discretion of the judges to
impose additional sanctions authorized in sentencing.
(d) The court shall determine, for every person who pleads nolo contendere to, or is
convicted of, an offense involving domestic violence as enumerated in § 12-29-2, whether, as a
result of the plea or conviction, the defendant is prohibited under § 11-47-5(a)(3) or § 11-47-
5(a)(4) from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in his or her possession any
firearm.
(1) Prior to the entry of a plea of nolo contendere to an offense involving domestic violence
as enumerated in § 12-29-2, the court shall advise the defendant that a plea of nolo contendere has
the same legal effect and collateral consequences as a plea of guilty.
(2) Prior to the entry of a plea of nolo contendere to an offense punishable as a felony
involving domestic violence as enumerated in § 12-29-2, or an offense enumerated in § 11-47-
5(a)(4), the court shall advise the defendant that, in addition to any other sentence or penalty, the
defendant shall, as result of the plea, be prohibited from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting,
or having in their possession any firearm under § 11-47-5.
(3) The person required to surrender his or her firearms pursuant to this section shall not
be responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.
(e) For the purposes of this section, “batterers intervention program” means a program that
is certified by the batterers intervention program standards oversight committee according to
minimum standards, pursuant to §§ 12-29-5.1, 12-29-5.2, and 12-29-5.3.
(f) For purposes of this section, “servicemember” means a person who is presently serving
in the armed forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, a reserve component thereof,
or the National Guard. “Veteran” means a person who has served in the armed forces, including
the Coast Guard of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard, and has
been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions.
(g) The court shall indicate on every record of conviction or a plea of nolo contendere for
LC002196 - Page 2 of 4

an offense punishable as a felony involving domestic violence, as defined in § 12-29-2, that the
defendant is prohibited under §§ 11-47-5 and 11-47-5.3 from purchasing, owning, carrying,
transporting, or having in their possession, any firearm(s). The court shall inform the defendant of
their prohibited status and shall order the defendant to surrender any firearm(s) in their ownership,
possession, care, custody or control in accordance with § 11-47-5.3.
(h) The court shall indicate on every record of conviction or a plea of nolo contendere for
an offense enumerated in § 11-47-5(a)(4) that the defendant is prohibited under §§ 11-47-5 and
11-47-5.4 from purchasing, owning, carrying, transporting, or having in their possession, any
firearm(s). The court shall inform the defendant of their prohibited status, shall order the defendant
to surrender any firearm(s) in their ownership, possession, care, custody or control, and shall ensure
that surrender is made in accordance with § 11-47-5.4.
(i) No proceeds shall be provided to any person if the firearm(s) is destroyed pursuant to
this section.
(j) Any firearm(s) used in the commission of the offense leading to the conviction pursuant
to this section shall be forfeited to the state upon conviction.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002196
========
LC002196 - Page 3 of 4